Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
ARTICLE 61
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH TRANSFORMATION COUNCIL

27-61-101 and 27-61-102. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article repealed, (SB 18-161), ch. 123, p. 830, § 1, effective September 1.

Editor's note:

This article was added in 2010. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 2018, consult the 2017 Colorado Revised Statutes and the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.